Wisconsin, session 2025, SB700.
do enact as follows:SB700,14Section 1. 350.12 (3) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB700,2,191350.12 (3) (a) 1. Except as provided under subs. (2) and (5) (cm), no person 2may operate and no owner may give permission for the operation of any snowmobile 3within this state unless the snowmobile is registered for public use or private use 4under this paragraph or s. 350.122 or as an antique under par. (b) and has the 5registration decals displayed as required under sub. (5) or s. 350.122 or unless the 6snowmobile has a plate and a registration decal attached as required under par. (c) 73. A snowmobile that is not registered as an antique under par. (b) may be 8registered for public use. A snowmobile that is not registered as an antique under 9par. (b) and that is used exclusively on private property, as defined under s. 23.33 (1) 10(n), may be registered for private use. A snowmobile public-use registration 11certificate is valid for 3 years beginning on the July 1 prior to the date of application 12if registration is made prior to April 1 and beginning on the July 1 subsequent to 13the date of application if registration is made after April 1 and ending on June 30, 143 years thereafter. A snowmobile private-use registration certificate is valid from 15the date of issuance until ownership of the snowmobile is transferred. The fee for 16the issuance or renewal of a public-use registration certificate is $30 $45, except 17that the fee is $5 if it is a snowmobile owned and operated by a political subdivision 18of this state. There is no fee for the issuance of a private-use registration certificate 19or for the issuance of a registration certificate to the state.SB700,220Section 2. 350.12 (3j) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB700,2,2421350.12 (3j) (b) The fee for a trail use sticker issued for a snowmobile that is 22exempt from registration under sub. (2) (b) or (bn) is $49.25 $69.25. A trail use 23sticker issued for such a snowmobile may be issued only by the department and 24persons appointed by the department and expires on June 30 of each year.SB700,31Section 3. 350.12 (3j) (bg) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB700,3,52350.12 (3j) (bg) 3. The fee for a trail use sticker issued for a snowmobile that 3is registered under sub. (3) and that is owned by a person who is both a member of 4a snowmobile club and a member of the Association of Wisconsin Snowmobile Clubs 5is $9.25 $19.25.SB700,46Section 4. 350.12 (3j) (bg) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB700,3,97350.12 (3j) (bg) 4. The fee for a trail use sticker issued for a snowmobile that 8is registered under sub. (3) and that is owned by a person who does not meet the 9requirements under subd. 3. is $29.25 $49.25.SB700,3,1010